Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 16. Education

Executive Order No. 16-1
(No. 11-93) [Identification of Vermont Higher Education Council as Postsecondary Review Entity.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 3-46 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 16-2
(No. 10-94) [Coordinating Council for Vermont Interactive Television.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 16-5 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-13), dated July 10, 2013.

Executive Order No. 16-3
(No. 13-94) [Vermont Goals 2000 Commission.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 3-46 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 16-4
(No. 03-09) [University of Vermont-Vermont State Colleges Task Force.

Expired by its own terms, effective March 15, 2010.

Executive Order No. 16-5
(No. 06-13) [Coordinating Council for Vermont Interactive Technologies.

WHEREAS, it is the policy of the State of Vermont to extend learning opportunities to all citizens regardless of geographic location; and

WHEREAS, the use of interactive technology for remote teaching applications has been successfully demonstrated at multiple locations throughout Vermont since 1988; and

WHEREAS, a joint private-public sponsorship coordinates Vermont’s interactive technology network.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby rename the “Coordinating Council for Vermont Interactive Television” the “Coordinating Council for Vermont Interactive Technologies,” and
reconstitute the Council as follows

Composition and Appointments

The Council shall be composed of two representatives of the business community, appointed by the Governor; two representatives of the education community, appointed by the Governor; two representatives of the non-profit community, appointed by the Governor;
a member of the Vermont House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House; a member of the Vermont Senate, appointed by the Committee on Committees; and a representative of the Administration, appointed by the
Governor.

Additional appointments shall be made by the Governor to fill vacancies or to respond to other critical needs.

Council Process and Change

The Council shall meet periodically and shall make recommendations to the Secretary of Administration and to the Executive Director of Vermont Interactive Technologies concerning:

A.
policy for overall system usage and development;

B.
priorities for operational scheduling;

C.
evaluation of system performance;

D.
future development and/or system expansion;

E.
budgetary information and requirements; and

F.
development of funding alternatives.

In addition, the Council shall maintain liaisons with appropriate legislative offices and annually advise the Governor and the General Assembly on the process and achievements of Vermont Interactive Technologies.

Administrative support will be provided by the Agency of Administration and the Vermont State Colleges as required.

Effective Date

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall expire on September 15, 2019.

This Order supersedes Executive Order 10-94 (codified as No. 16-2).

Dated July 10, 2013.